Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.24.095

Distribution of filing fees.

Fees paid when filing for office must be collected by the filing officer and distributed as follows:

(1) When the candidacy is for a statewide office, the United States senate, the United States house of representatives, or the state supreme court, the fee shall be retained by the secretary of state;

(2) When the candidacy is for a Washington state legislative, state court of appeals, or a superior court judicial office, the fees shall be distributed to the office of the county auditor or auditors whose counties comprise the district. When the district includes multiple counties, the distribution must be an equal division between the counties comprising the district;

(3) When the candidacy is for a city or town office, the county auditor shall transmit fees to the city or town clerk for deposit in the city or town treasury; and

(4) When the candidacy is for any other office, the fees shall be retained by the office of the filing officer.

[ 2023 c 394 s 6.]